Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 9. Competitive Employment Opportunities for Persons with Disabilities.

§ 43-6-201.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The Mississippi Legislature finds that the benefits of meaningful work have significance and importance to all working-age persons, including persons with disabilities. In order to achieve meaningful and competitive employment for persons with disabilities, employment opportunities in fully integrated work settings shall be, to the extent practicable, the first and priority option explored in planning and providing services and supports for working-age persons with disabilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-6-203.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words shall have the following meaning, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Competitive employment” means work in the competitive labor market that is performed on a full-time or part-time basis in an integrated setting and for which a person with a disability is compensated in a manner consistent with applicable wage-and-hour laws. Pay shall be comparable to the customary wage and level of benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by persons without disabilities.

“Disability” means, with respect to a person, a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities of such person as defined in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended. A “disability” does not include brief periods of intoxication caused by alcohol or drugs or dependence upon or addiction to any alcohol or drugs.

“Integrated setting” means a setting typically found in the community in which persons with disabilities interact with persons without disabilities (other than disability service providers) to a comparable extent that persons without disabilities in comparable positions interact with other persons.

“Working age” means fourteen (14) years of age or older in accordance with Section 71-7-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-6-205.
Competitive employment opportunities in fully integrated work settings to be considered first and priority option when planning or providing services and supports to persons with disabilities.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that competitive employment in an integrated setting shall be, to the extent practicable, considered the first and priority option when planning or providing services and supports to persons with disabilities who are of working age. All state agencies that provide services and support to persons with disabilities, and/or employment-related services, shall, using available resources, follow this policy and ensure that it is effectively implemented in their programs and services; however, nothing in this article shall supersede any agency’s ability to fulfill the agency’s duties and requirements mandated by federal statutes. Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or disallow any disability benefits to which a person with a disability who is unable to be employed as contemplated by this article would otherwise be entitled. Nothing in this article shall be construed to require any state agency or other employer to give preference to hiring persons with disabilities or to prohibit any employment relationship or program that is otherwise permitted under applicable law. Any person with a disability who is employed by a state agency must meet the minimum qualifications and requirements for the position in which the person is employed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-6-207.
Implementation of policy by state agencies.

All state agencies that provide services to persons with disabilities and/or employment services shall coordinate efforts and shall collaborate within and among such agencies to ensure that state programs, policies, procedures and funding support competitive employment in integrated settings for persons with disabilities who are of working age. All such state agencies shall, whenever feasible, share data and information across systems in order to track progress toward full implementation of this article. All such state agencies are encouraged to adopt measurable goals and objectives to promote assessment of progress in implementing this article.

State agencies are authorized to adopt rules and regulations to implement this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-6-209.
Oversight of implementation of policy by Disability Resource Commission.

The Disability Resource Commission as described in Section 43-30-1 is directed to provide the monitoring and oversight of the implementation of this article by state agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-6-211.
Article not to prohibit appropriate use of certain other employment options, or require expenditure of funds or grant enforceable right or cause of action.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to prohibit the appropriate use of programs known as center-based employment, employment centers, skill development centers, vocational rehabilitation centers, and/or other employment options.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to require the expenditure of funds on any particular program or at any particular level or to grant any person or organization a judicially enforceable right or cause of action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 469, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015.